Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202386-1503
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Rural Communications Sustainability Act:

(1) Broadband deployment program means a federal or state program authorizing payment of public funds for the purpose of deployment of communications infrastructure;

(2) Commission means the Public Service Commission;

(3) Communications infrastructure means infrastructure, facilities, and equipment capable of providing broadband or telecommunications services;

(4) Competitive provider means a communications provider as defined in section 86-125, including, but not limited to, lawfully franchised cable providers and competitive local exchange carriers in a local exchange area;

(5) Deployment project area means a contiguous geographic area consisting of locations serviceable by broadband or telecommunications services determined by the granting agency for a project funded under a broadband deployment program. A deployment project area may consist of geographical areas in more than one local exchange area;

(6) Eligible telecommunications carrier has the same meaning as in section 86-134;

(7) Granting agency means any state agency or political subdivision of the state which has authority to award, grant, direct, or redirect public funds under a broadband deployment program;

(8) Incumbent carrier means an incumbent carrier in a local exchange area as defined by rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission; and

(9) Local exchange area has the same meaning as in section 86-115.

Laws 2023, LB683, § 14.
May 27, 2023